Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1033.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406qq. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for insulin with no cost-sharing requirement for the insured. (2) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage of medically necessary covered diabetes devices and diabetic ketoacidosis devices, such as blood glucose test strips, glucometers, continuous glucometers, lancets, or insulin syringes with no cost-sharing requirement for the insured. (3) As used in this section, "cost-sharing requirement" means deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, out-of-pocket expenses, aggregate lifetime limits, and annual limits.